Maine, session 132, LD178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4320-N, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Associated conditions" means the symptoms or side effects associated with
metastatic cancer or its treatment and that, in the judgment of the health care
practitioner, further jeopardize the health of a patient if left untreated.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4320-N, sub-§1, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. "Metastatic cancer" means cancer that has spread from the primary or original
site of the cancer to nearby tissues, lymph nodes or other areas or parts of the body.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §4320-N, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Step therapy for metastatic cancer and associated conditions prohibited.
Notwithstanding subsection 6, paragraph B, with respect to coverage of a prescription drug
on a carrier's formulary for the treatment of metastatic cancer and associated conditions, a
carrier or utilization review organization may not require that the enrollee use a step therapy
protocol before the carrier provides coverage of a prescription drug approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Departments and Agencies - Statewide 0016
Initiative: Provides funding to allow enrollees to use step therapy protocols before the
carrier provides coverage of prescription drugs approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration. The expanded requirements apply to health plans issued or renewed
on or after January 1, 2026.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $7,176
__________ __________
Page 1 - 132LR0578(03)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,176
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,496
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $2,496
Page 2 - 132LR0578(03)